Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5313
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-5301 to 71-5313 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act.

Laws 1976, LB 821, § 13;

Laws 1988, LB 383, § 10;

Laws 1997, LB 517, § 24;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1231.